Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF98.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14d. new text end new text begin Noncertified applicator. new text end new text begin "Noncertified applicator" means a person who meets all the requirements specified in Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, section 171.201, except that a private applicator providing direct supervision under Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, section 171.201, paragraph (b)(2)(iii)(A), is not required to be an immediate family member. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.30, is amended to read: 18B.30 PESTICIDE USE LICENSE REQUIREMENT; INTERNET SALES PROHIBITED; RESTRICTED USE PESTICIDES. (a) A person may not use a restricted use pesticide without a license or certification required under sections 18B.29 to 18B.35new text begin ,new text end and the use may only be done under conditions prescribed by the commissioner.new text begin This paragraph does not apply to a noncertified applicator.new text end (b) A person shall not sell any pesticide labeled for restricted use over an Internet website to a Minnesota resident who is not a licensed or certified pesticide applicator. A person selling a pesticide labeled for restricted use over an Internet website to a Minnesota resident must verify that the purchaser is a licensed or certified pesticide applicator under sections 18B.29 to 18B.35. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.32, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1 does not apply to a noncertified applicator. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.33, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1 does not apply to a noncertified applicator. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.34, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1 does not apply to a noncertified applicator. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.36, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1 does not apply to a noncertified applicator. new text end